North Carolina, session 2025, HB11.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.5(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Other Deductions. – In calculating North Carolina taxable income, a taxpayer may
deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted gross income any of the following items that are included in
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income:
…
(17) Any amount received as overtime compensation pursuant to sections 206 and
207 of the Fair Labor Standards Act, as amended. In the case of a married
couple filing a joint return, each spouse may qualify separately for the
deduction allowed under this subdivision. To claim this deduction, the
taxpayer shall provide any information required by the Secretary.
(18) The amount received as bonus pay not to exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500). For purposes of this subdivision, "bonus pay" means
supplemental wages, as defined in 26 C.F.R. § 31.3402(g)-1, not including
tips, paid to an employee as a cash award and in recognition of the employee's
outstanding work, suggestions, or similar workplace dedication. In the case of
a married couple filing a joint return, each spouse may qualify separately for
the deduction allowed under this subdivision. To claim this deduction, the
taxpayer shall provide any information required by the Secretary.
(19) Any amount received as tips that are required to be reported to the taxpayer's
employer pursuant to section 6053(a) of the Code."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.
*H11-v-1*